Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202016-649
Improvements; contracts; bids; requirement.

All improvements of any streets, avenues, or alleys in a city of the first class for which, or any part thereof, a special tax shall be levied, shall be done by contract with the lowest responsible bidder to be determined by the city council.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 74, p. 288;

R.S.1913, § 4941;

C.S.1922, § 4109;

Laws 1925, c. 50, § 13, p. 201;

C.S.1929, § 16-638;

R.S.1943, § 16-649;

Laws 1967, c. 67, § 16, p. 227;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 106;

Laws 2019, LB194, § 51.

Engineer may estimate total work and need not do so by item, and where bids are called for on four different kinds of material, and the contract is let for one of the kinds shown in the advertisement for bids, such estimate and advertisement for bids are sufficient. Wurdeman v. City of Columbus, 100 Neb. 134, 158 N.W. 924 (1916).